Washington statutes.
RCW 33.16.120

Statement of assets and liabilities—Reports.

The board of directors shall cause to be prepared, from the books of the association, a statement of assets and of liabilities, at the end of the association's fiscal year.

The board shall also cause to be prepared, certified, and filed with the director, upon blanks to be furnished by the director, such reports and statements as the director, from time to time, may require.

[ 1994 c 92 s 440; 1982 c 3 s 35; 1973 c 130 s 23; 1945 c 235 s 27; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-146. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 79; 1919 c 169 ss 11, 12; 1913 c 110 ss 18, 19; 1890 p 56 ss 18, 36.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.